Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,100
Hospital and nursing facility services; reimbursement; rate methodology; rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the rate methodology for reimbursement of hospital and nursing facility services. Any change to the rate methodology is considered substantive and requires a new rulemaking or regulationmaking proceeding under the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 2.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.